Utah statutes.
65A-8-203.   Cooperative fire protection agreements with counties.

(1)  The county legislative body of any county may enter into a cooperative agreement with the division to receive financial and supervisory cooperation and assistance from the division.

(2)  A county may not receive cooperation or assistance under Subsection (1) until a cooperative agreement is executed by the county legislative body and the division.

(3)  In order to be eligible to enter into a cooperative agreement with the division, the county shall:

(a)  adopt a wildland fire ordinance based upon minimum standards established by the division;

(b)  require that the county fire department or equivalent private provider under contract with the county meet minimum standards for wildland fire training, certification, and wildland fire suppression equipment based upon nationally accepted standards as specified by the division; and

(c)  file with the division a budget for fire suppression costs.

(4)  A county that chooses not to enter into a cooperative agreement with the division may not be eligible to receive financial assistance from the division.

(5)  The state forester may execute the agreements and may divide the state into fire protection districts.

(6)  These districts shall provide efficient and economical fire protection within the area defined.

(7)  The districts may comprise one or more counties, or portions of counties to be specified in the cooperative agreements.

(8)  Under the terms of the cooperative agreements, the state forester shall file annual budgets for operation of the cooperative districts with each participating county.

(9)  If the county approves a budget mutually acceptable to the county and the state forester, and budgets an amount for actual fire suppression costs determined to be normal by the state forester, the agreement shall commit the state to pay 1/2 of the actual suppression costs that exceed the stated normal costs.

